Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 31.1 The Rhode Island Bays, Rivers and Watersheds Fund

46-31.1-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares as follows:

The bays, rivers, and associated watersheds of Rhode Island are unique and unparalleled natural resources that provide significant cultural, ecological, and economic benefit to the state.

Pursuant to the provisions of

R.I. Const., art. 1, § 17

, it is the duty of the general assembly to provide for the conservation of the air, land, water, plant, animal, mineral, and other natural resources of the state; and to adopt all means necessary and proper by law to protect the natural environment of the people of the state by providing adequate resource planning for the control and regulation of the use of the natural resources of the state; and for the preservation, regeneration, and restoration of the natural environment of the state.

It is in the best interest of the state and its citizens to preserve, protect, and restore our bays, rivers, and associated watersheds.

Sixty percent (60%) of the watershed of Narragansett Bay is within Massachusetts, almost all of the watershed of Mount Hope Bay is within Massachusetts, and five percent (5%) of the watershed of Little Narragansett Bay is within Connecticut; further, a cluster of water-related economic interests spans the three (3) states.

There is a need to foster effective management, preservation, restoration, and monitoring of the bays, rivers, and watersheds; and the promotion of sustainable economic development of businesses that rely directly or indirectly on the bays, rivers, and watersheds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 2.

46-31.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Bays” means the estuaries including Narragansett Bay, Mount Hope Bay, Greenwich Bay, Little Narragansett Bay, the coastal ponds, the Sakonnet River, and Rhode Island territorial waters that extend seaward three geographical miles from the shoreline including the area around Block Island.

“Coordination” means to harmonize in a common action or effort and/or to function in a complementary manner.

“River” means a flowing body of water or estuary or a section, portion, or tributary thereof, including, but not limited to, streams, creeks, brooks, ponds, and small lakes.

“Water cluster” means an economically interconnected grouping of businesses, institutions, and people relying directly or indirectly on the bays, rivers, and watersheds including, but not limited to, the following sectors:

Recreation, tourism, and public events;

Fisheries and aquaculture;

Boat and ship building;

Boating-related businesses;

Transportation;

Military;

Research; and

Technology development and education.

“Watershed” means a land area which because of its topography, soil type, and drainage patterns acts as a collector of raw waters which regorge or replenish rivers and existing or planned public water supplies.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 2.

46-31.1-3.
Bays, Rivers and Watersheds Fund.

There is hereby established a restricted receipt account within the Department of Environmental Management to be called the Bays, Rivers and Watersheds Fund;

The fund shall consist of any funds which the state may from time to time appropriate, as well as money received as gifts, grants, bequests, donations or other funds from any public or private sources, as well as all fees collected pursuant to §

46-23-1(f)(2)

for the leasing of submerged lands for transatlantic cables, and all fees collected pursuant to chapter 12.11 of this title for the disposal of septage;

All funds, monies, and fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Bays, Rivers and Watersheds Fund, and shall be utilized by the Department of Environmental Management consistent with the purposes of §

46-23.2-1

entitled, “The Comprehensive Watershed and Marine Monitoring Act of 2004,” § 46-12, “Water Pollution” and chapter 6.2 of title 4 entitled “Resilient Rhode Island Act of 2014 Climate Change Coordination Council.” All expenditures from the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 2.

46-31.1-4.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 2.